Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5685.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 81c. (1) A person An individual who communicates to any person a threat that he or she will physically harm an individual who is an employee of the family independence agency does any of the following and who does so because of the an individual's status as an employee of that agency the department of health and human services or an employee of a private agency under contract with the department of health and human services as provided under section 14f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14f, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both: (a) Communicates to any individual a threat that the individual will physically harm an individual who is an employee of the department of health and human services or an employee of a private agency under contract with the department of health and human services as provided under section 14f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14f. (b) Intimidates an individual who is an employee of the department of health and human services or an employee of a private agency under contract with the department of health and human services as provided under section 14f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14f. (c) Harasses an individual who is an employee of the department of health and human services or an employee of a private agency under contract with the department of health and human services as provided under section 14f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14f. (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), a person an individual who assaults or assaults and batters an individual while the individual is performing his or her the individual's duties as an employee of the family independence agency department of health and human services or an employee of a private agency under contract with the department of health and human services as provided under section 14f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14f, or because of the individual's status as an employee of that agency the department of health and human services or an employee of a private agency under contract with the department of health and human services as provided under section 14f of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14f, and causes the individual any physical injury is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) A person An individual who assaults or assaults and batters an individual while the individual is performing his or her duties as an employee of the family independence agency or because of the individual's status as an employee of that agency violates subsection (2) and causes the individual serious impairment of a body function is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not less than $1,000.00 or more than $5,000.00, or both. (4) A conviction or sentence imposed for a violation of this section does not preclude a conviction or sentence for a violation of any other applicable law. (5) As used in this section: , "serious (a) "Harass" means conduct directed toward a victim that includes, but is not limited to, repeated or continuing unconsented contact that would cause a reasonable individual to suffer emotional distress and that actually causes the victim to suffer emotional distress. Harass does not include constitutionally protected activity or conduct that serves a legitimate purpose. (b) "Intimidate" means a willful course of conduct involving harassment of another individual that is intended to cause the individual to fear physical injury, that would cause a reasonable individual to fear physical injury, and that actually causes the individual to fear physical injury. Intimidate does not include constitutionally protected activity or conduct that serves a legitimate purpose. (c) "Serious impairment of a body function" means that phrase as defined in section 625(5) 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625.257.58c. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.